North Carolina, session 2025, SB333.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 116-11.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-11.4. Accreditation.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
…
(2) Accrediting agency. – An agency or association that accredits institutions of
higher education.
…
(b1) Illegal Accreditation Requirements Prohibited. – A constituent institution of The
University of North Carolina shall not take any action in violation of State or federal law because
of any principle, standard, policy, or other requirement of an accrediting agency.
…
(d) Certain Programs Exempt. – The Except as provided in subsection (b1) of this section,
the requirements of this section do not apply to professional, graduate, departmental, or certificate
programs at constituent institutions that have specific accreditation requirements or best
practices, including law, pharmacy, engineering, and other similar educational programs, as
identified by the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115D-6.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-6.2. Accreditation.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
…
(2) Accrediting agency. – An agency or association that accredits institutions of
higher education.
…
(b1) Illegal Accreditation Requirements Prohibited. – A community college shall not take
any action in violation of State or federal law because of any principle, standard, policy, or other
requirement of an accrediting agency.
…
(d) Certain Programs Exempt. – The Except as provided in subsection (b1) of this section,
the requirements of this section do not apply to professional, departmental, or certificate
*S333-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
programs at community colleges that have specific accreditation requirements or best practices,
as identified by the State Board of Community Colleges.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 333-First Edition